Indiana, session 2026, SB200.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 20-26-5-4.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.1. (a) This section applies to a vendor contract
entered into, amended, or renewed after June 30, 2026.
(b) As used in this section, "automatic renewal provision"
means a provision in a vendor contract that provides for the
automatic renewal of the contract unless the governing body of a
school corporation or the equivalent authority for a charter school
gives notice to the vendor that the school corporation or charter
school intends to terminate the vendor contract at the end of the
contract term.
(c) As used in this section, "choice of law provision" means a
term within a vendor contract that subjects the vendor contract to
the laws of a state other than Indiana.
(d) As used in this section, "indemnity provision" means a
provision, a clause, a covenant, or an agreement that:
(1) is contained in, collateral to, or affecting a vendor
contract; and
(2) purports to indemnify, defend, or hold harmless, or has the
effect of indemnifying, defending, or holding harmless, a
vendor against liability for loss or damage resulting from:
(A) negligence;
SEA 200 — Concur

2
(B) intentional acts; or
(C) omissions;
of the vendor or an agent, employee, servant, or independent
contractor that is directly responsible to the vendor.
(e) As used in this section, "vendor contract" means a contract
between a governing body of a school corporation or the equivalent
authority for a charter school and a vendor in which the vendor
promises to provide goods or services.
(f) Notwithstanding any other law, an indemnity provision in a
vendor contract under this section is:
(1) against public policy; and
(2) void and unenforceable.
(g) Notwithstanding any other law, a choice of law provision in
a vendor contract under this section is:
(1) against public policy; and
(2) void and unenforceable.
A vendor contract is only subject to the laws of the state of Indiana.
(h) Notwithstanding any other law, an automatic renewal
provision in a vendor contract under this section is:
(1) against public policy; and
(2) void and unenforceable.
SECTION 2. IC 20-26-5-48 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 48. If a public school, including a charter school,
allows a postsecondary educational institution to provide
information regarding postsecondary education or training to
students of the public school, the public school shall allow military
personnel to provide, in the same manner as the postsecondary
educational institution, information regarding educational
opportunities and financial education benefits available for service
in the armed forces, national guard, or reserve component of the
armed forces or national guard.
SECTION 3. IC 20-26-20-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.86-2020,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) Upon request by an organization under
section 3 of this chapter, a public school shall provide at least one (1)
time each school year, a day and time, which may be during the school
day or at a time where a majority of students and their families will
be present on school property, as approved by the public school, for
the representatives of the organization to provide information to
students on school property as described in section 3 of this chapter.
(b) An organization may submit a grievance to the department,
SEA 200 — Concur

3
in a manner prescribed by the department, if a public school
refuses to allow an organization to provide information to students
on school property as required by subsection (a).
SEA 200 — Concur

President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Speaker of the House of Representatives
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
SEA 200 — Concur